Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.08.100

Scope of regulated activities of a state trust company.

Notwithstanding the definition of "trust business" as set forth in RCW 30B.04.005, the director has the authority to regulate the exercise of all powers and authorities of a state trust company which are enumerated in RCW 30B.08.080 and which may be conferred by way of parity under RCW 30B.38.060.

[ 2014 c 37 s 331.]